Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.380

Construction, reconstruction, equipping, and demolition of community college facilities and acquisition of property—Bonds—Additional powers incident to bond authorization.

In accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.340 the college board is hereby empowered:

(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any bonds being issued;

(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement fund and any reserve account therein;

(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the college board's capital projects account to the bond retirement fund when necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made; and

(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.380. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 38. Formerly RCW 28.85.380.]